Wyoming, session 2025, HB0326.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) As used in this section, "veterans' home of
Wyoming" means the veterans' home domiciliary at Buffalo,
Wyoming established as a state institution in W.S.
25-1-201(a)(vii).

HB0326

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0608
(b) There is appropriated seventy-nine million
dollars ($79,000,000.00) from the general fund to the state
construction department for purposes of level III
construction to remodel the veterans' home of Wyoming in
accordance with W.S. 9-5-108(a)(iii) and as provided in
subsection (b) of this section. This appropriation shall
not be construed to be an entitlement or guaranteed amount.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with
the effective date of this section and remaining in effect
until the project is completed, unless otherwise provided.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law upon completion of the remodel of the veterans' home
of Wyoming.

(c) The state construction department is authorized
to expend a portion of the funds appropriated under
subsection (a) of this section as necessary to fund one (1)
existing at-will employee contract position for the
duration of the project, for purposes of administrating and
managing design and construction activities.

HB0326

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0608
(d) Federal funds received by the state of Wyoming for
state run veterans' home facilities shall:

(i) Be deposited to the general fund in an
equivalent amount of expended general funds to the extent
funds from the general fund appropriation in subsection (a)
of this section have been expended; and

(ii) Reduce the general fund appropriation in
subsection (a) of this section by one dollar ($1.00) for
each one dollar ($1.00) in federal funds for any remaining
federal funds received in excess of the amount deposited
under paragraph (i) of this subsection.

(e) The total expenditure for level III construction
of the veterans' home of Wyoming shall not exceed one
hundred three million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars
($103,850,000.00) in the aggregate. This limitation shall
apply to the sum of the following:

(i) The appropriation in subsection (a) of this
section;

HB0326

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0608
(ii) Amounts authorized for expenditure by the
governor under W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii);

(iii) Amounts appropriated for the veterans'
home of Wyoming pursuant to 2022 Wyoming session laws,
chapter 49, section 4, section 027;

(iv) Any federal funds received by the state of
Wyoming for state run veterans' home facilities.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0326